District of Columbia statutes.
10-505.06

Transfer of member of Metropolitan Police to Capitol Police — Appropriations.

Until otherwise provided by law, the contingent fund of the House of Representatives shall be available to carry out this part.

Dec. 20, 1979, 93 Stat. 1099, Pub. L. 96-152, § 6
1981 Ed., § 9-121.